Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1. In General

§ 12-7-101.
Causes generally.

Any violation of this title by any manufacturer, rectifier, wholesaler, licensee, employee or agent thereof is sufficient cause for the suspension and in the case of gross violation the revocation of the license of the licensee.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 25; C.S. 1945, § 53-227; W.S. 1957, § 12-28; Laws 1961, ch. 172, § 4; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-130; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2.

Construction.—

Gross, as used in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

12-7-101

, speaks to the degree of violation that must occur before a license can be revoked and requires a transgression of Title 12 so unreasonable as to be flagrant. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

Gross violation of Title 12 will necessarily violate the intent and purpose of Title 12. Thus, it remains true that the court may revoke the license or permit upon proof that the intent and purpose of Title 12 has been violated, subject to the qualification that the violation be gross. Therefore, a court must conclude that a licensee committed a gross violation of Title 12 before it can revoke a liquor license. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

Violation shown.—

District court did not err in holding a licensee committed a gross violation of Title 12, despite its asserted reliance on the advice of counsel, where it knowingly submitted a false application under penalty of perjury about having a one-year lease. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

District court did not abuse its discretion in revoking the liquor license as it understood its discretion and considered the evidence and nature of the violation in determining that suspension was not a meaningful consequence of the licensee’s false statement on the application regarding a one year lease. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

Applied

in

Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 563 F.2d 425, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 11486 (10th Cir. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For article “The License Problem,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 106.

§ 12-7-102.
Suspension of license when revocation inadvisable.

In a proceeding for revocation of a liquor license and when a licensee is found guilty of violating W.S.

12-1-101

through

12-8-301

, the district court or the division may, if it appears inadvisable to revoke the license, suspend the license for a period not to exceed the balance of the term for which the license was issued and the suspension shall not, of itself, disqualify the license holder for renewal at the end of the license term.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 136,§ 4; W.S. 1957, § 12-30; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-132; Laws 1978, ch. 51,§ 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission.”

§ 12-7-103.
Suspension of license by licensing authorities for failure to pay sales tax.

A local licensing authority may suspend any license issued under this title if the licensee fails to pay sales taxes and the division has ceased sales of alcoholic liquor to the licensee pursuant to W.S.

12-2-306

. The licensee may appeal license suspension to the district court in the manner specified under W.S. 12-4-104(f) and the appeal proceedings shall be in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. The suspension shall remain in effect pending a decision by the appellate court.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 122, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in the first sentence.